Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRANSFER AND APPROPRIATION; CAPI USA HOMEOWNERSHIP EDUCATION AND FINANCIAL COUNSELING PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 are transferred from the general fund to the housing development fund. This is a onetime transfer. new text end new text begin (b) $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the housing development fund to the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency for a grant to CAPI USA to administer the CAPI USA homeownership education and financial counseling programming. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end